Maryland, session 2025, HB0904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of Planning, in consultation with the Maryland Energy
Administration, shall conduct a study to identify and evaluate land owned by the
Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services for the siting of new solar energy
projects.
(b) The study shall include:
(1) development of criteria to be used to assess and compare the suitability
of sites for new solar projects; and
(2) an assessment of the feasibility of using lease agreements for solar
energy projects on land owned by the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services.
(c) On or before October 1, 2027, the Department of Planning shall report its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0904*